Hawaii statutes.
§189-45 Loans, terms, and restrictions.
The department may make loans to individuals or businesses for the financing of
expenses incurred in the purchase, construction, renovation, maintenance, and
repair of small fishing vessels. The loans may be made in conjunction with
loans made by other financial institutions including the Small Business
Administration or loans guaranteed by the National Marine Fisheries Service.
Where the loans made by the department are secured, such security may be
subordinated to the loans made by other financial institutions, when such
subordination is required in order to obtain loans from such institutions. The
necessity for and the extent of security required in any loan shall be
determined by the director.

The foregoing powers shall be subject, however,
to the following restrictions and limitations:

(1) No loan shall exceed $50,000.

(2) No loan shall be made for a term exceeding ten
years.

(3) Each loan shall bear simple interest at the rate
of seven and one-half per cent a year.

(4) The commencement date for the repayment of the
first installment on the principal of each loan may be deferred by the
director, but in no event shall such initial payment be deferred in excess of
two years. [L 1975, c 167, §11; am L 1976, c 70, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next